Hawaii statutes.
§412:3-109 Charging down assets. The
commissioner may require any asset on the books of a Hawaii financial
institution to be charged down to such sum as represents its fair value. [L
1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next